Delaware, session 153, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. The State Registrar of Vital Statistics shall amend the birth certificate of Levi Ryan Murray under Â§ 3131(b) of Title 16 of the Delaware Code by entering the name âRyan Murrayâ as the father of Levi Ryan Murray. Section 2. Notwithstanding Â§ 3131(c) of Title 16 of the Delaware Code, the State Registrar of Vital Statistics may not mark the birth certificate of Levi Ryan Murray issued under Section 1 of this Act as âdelayedâ or âamendedâ. SYNOPSIS There is a conflict in Delaware law related to determining whether the name of the husband who dies during the period between the creation of the embryo and placement of the embryo should or can be entered on the birth certificate as the father of the child conceived. Because of this conflict, this Act directs the State Registrar of Vital Statistics to immediately amend the birth certificate of the impacted individual, Levi Ryan Murray, to include the name of his father, Ryan Murray, on his birth certificate. This Act is necessary so that this childâs birth certificate can be completed while the General Assembly considers how to resolve this conflict in the law generally. The only difference between Senate Substitute No. 1 for Senate Bill No. 119 and SB 119 is that SS 1 for SB 119 corrects a misspelling of âMurrayâ. Author: Senator Pettyjohn